Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.441

Action on plan of conversion by converting limited liability company.

(1) Subject to RCW 25.15.456, a plan of conversion must be approved either by all the members of a converting limited liability company or as provided in a written limited liability company agreement.

(2) Subject to RCW 25.15.456 and any contractual rights, after a conversion is approved, and at any time before a filing is made under RCW 25.15.446, a converting limited liability company may amend the plan or abandon the planned conversion:

(a) As provided in the plan; and

(b) Except as prohibited by the plan, by the same approval as was required to approve the plan.

[ 2022 c 42 s 306; 2015 c 188 s 85.]